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DTC P 1300/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No. 1)

DTC P 1305/15 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.2)

DTC P 1310/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.3)

DTC P 1315/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.4)

DTC P 1320/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.5)

DTC P 1325/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.6)

DTC P 1330/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.7)

DTC P 1340/14 IgniterCircuitMalfunction(No.8)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A DIS (Direct Ignition System) has been adopted. The DIS improves the ignition timing accuracy, reduces
high−voltage loss,andenhances the theoverall reliabilityof the ignitionsystembyeliminating thedistributor.
TheDIS isa 1−cylinder ignitionsystemwhich ignitesonecylinderwithone ignitioncoil. In the 1−cylinder
ignition system, the one spark plug is connected to the end of the secondary winding. High voltage generated
in the secondary winding is applied directly to the spark plug. The spark of the spark plug pass from the center
elecrtode to the ground electrode.
The engine ECU determines ignition timing and outputs the ignition signals (IGT) for each cylinder. Based
on IGT signals, the power transistors in the igniter cuts off the current to the primary coil in the ignition coil
is supplied to the spark plug that are connected to the end of the secondary coil. At the same time, the igniter
alsosendsan ignitionconfirmationsignal (IGF)asa fail −safemeasure to theengineECU.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P1300/14
P1305/15
P1310/14
P1315/14
P1320/14
P1325/14
P1330/14
P1340/14

No IGF signal to engine ECU while engine is running

SOpenorshort in IGF 1 or IGF2and IGT 1 � 8circuit from
ignition coil with igniter
SNo.1 � No.8 ignitioncoilwith igniter
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S IfDTCP 1300/14 isdisplayed,checkNo. 1 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1305/15 isdisplayed,checkNo.2 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1310/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.3 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1315/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.4 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1320/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.5 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1325/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.6 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1330/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.7 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1340/14 isdisplayed,checkNo.8 ignitioncoilwith ignitercircuit.
S IfDTCP 1300/14,P 1315/14,P 1325/14,P 1330/14areoutputsimultaneously, IGF 1 circuitmaybe

open or short.
S IfDTCP 1305/15,P 1310/14,P 1320/14,P 1340/14areoutputsimultaneously, IGF2circuitmaybe

open or short.
S Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the time
of the malfunction.

1 Check spark plug and spark (See page IG−1).

NG Go to step 4.

OK

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGF and IGT signal circuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil with igniter (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 Disconnect ignition coil with igniter connector and check voltage between termi-
nals IGF1, 2 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment.
(b) Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGF1, 2 of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 4.5 − 5.5 V

OK Replace ignition coil with igniter.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

4 Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGT signal circuit between
engine ECU and ignition coil with igniter (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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5 Check voltage between terminals IGT1 � 8 of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the glove compartment door.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1 � 8 of the engine
ECU connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5 V

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
During cranking or idling, check waveform between terminals
IGT1 � 8 and E1 of the engine ECU connector.
HINT:
Correct waveform appears as sohwn, with rectangle waves.

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

6 Disconnect ignition coil with igniter connector and check voltage between termi-
nals IGT1 � 8 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IGT1 � 8 of the engine
ECU connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5 V

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK
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7 Check ignition coil with igniter power source circuit.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the ignition coil with igniter connector.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal 1 of ignition coil with igniter
connector and body ground, when ignition switch is turned to
”ON” and ”START” position.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

OK Repair ignition coil with igniter power source
circuit.

NG

8 Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition switch and
ignition coil with igniter (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

9 Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI) (See page FI−52).

NG Replace EFI main relay (marking: EFI).

OK

Replace ignition coil with igniter.


